Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that manufactured housing plays a key role in the availability of affordable homeownership opportunities in Washington state. The legislature also finds that it has taken steps to help preserve the availability and affordability of rental lots for manufactured homeowners, who are often senior or low-income households. However, the legislature further finds that acquisition of local manufactured housing communities by large investment and business entities is driving local landlords out of business while displacing homeowners with significant increases in rent and fees. Therefore, the legislature intends to prohibit large investment and business entities from purchasing more of the state's existing manufactured housing communities so that our state's residents and families can afford to buy and live in manufactured homes in existing communities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1)(a) A business entity may not purchase, acquire, or otherwise obtain an interest in another manufactured housing community or lot if it has an interest in at least:(i) Five manufactured housing communities; or(ii) 200 manufactured housing lots in one or more manufactured housing communities.(b) An investment entity may not purchase, acquire, or otherwise obtain an interest in a manufactured housing community or lot.(2) A business or investment entity is not subject to the prohibitions in subsection (1) of this section if the entity is:(a) An eligible organization as defined in RCW 59.20.030; or(b) Acquiring an ownership interest in a manufactured housing community or lot through the development of a new manufactured housing community or lot.(3) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.(4) A seller of a manufactured housing community or lot is not liable for any violation of this section.(5) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Business entity" means any association, company, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other legal entity, and that entity's successors, assignees, or affiliates. "Business entity" does not include an investment entity.(b) "Investment entity" means:(i) A real estate investment trust as defined by any state or federal statute; or(ii) An entity that manages funds pooled from investors and owes a fiduciary to those investors.(c) "Manufactured housing community" means any real property which is rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or more mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models for the primary purpose of production of income, except where such real property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only and is not intended for year-round occupancy.(d) "Manufactured housing lot" or "lot" means a portion of a manufactured housing community designated as the location of one mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory buildings, and intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by the occupants of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model.Sec. 3. RCW 19.86.140 and 2024 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Every person who shall violate the terms of any injunction issued as in this chapter provided, shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of not more than $125,000.Every person who violates RCW 19.86.030 or 19.86.040 shall pay a civil penalty of up to three times the unlawful gains or loss avoided as a result of each violation.Every person who violates RCW 19.86.020 shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of not more than $7,500 for each violation: PROVIDED, That nothing in this paragraph shall apply to any radio or television broadcasting station which broadcasts, or to any publisher, printer or distributor of any newspaper, magazine, billboard or other advertising medium who publishes, prints or distributes, advertising in good faith without knowledge of its false, deceptive or misleading character.Every person who violates section 2 of this act shall pay a civil penalty of not more than $100,000 for each violation and sell the property in violation to an independent third party within one year of the date that the court enters the judgment. Every person who fails to sell property in violation to an independent party within one year of entry of judgment shall pay an additional civil penalty of not more than the amount for violating the terms of an injunction issued under this chapter.For unlawful acts or practices that target or impact specific individuals or communities based on demographic characteristics including, but not limited to, age, race, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sex, sexual orientation, presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, religion, veteran status, or status as a member of the armed forces, as that term is defined in 10 U.S.C. Sec. 101, an enhanced penalty of $5,000 shall apply.For the purpose of this section the superior court issuing any injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition for the recovery of civil penalties.With respect to violations of RCW 19.86.030 and 19.86.040, the attorney general, acting in the name of the state, may seek recovery of such penalties in a civil action.By December 1, 2022, and every five years thereafter, the office of the attorney general shall evaluate the efficacy of the maximum civil penalty amounts established in this section in deterring violations of the consumer protection act and the difference, if any, between the current penalty amounts and the penalty amounts adjusted for inflation, and provide the legislature with a report of its findings and any recommendations in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.--- END ---